Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2389.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 37 of the act of March 1, 1974 (P.L.90, No.24), known as the Pennsylvania Pesticide Control Act of 1973, is amended to read:Section 37. Delegation of Duties; [Exclusion] Limitation of Local Laws and Regulations.--(a) All authority vested in the secretary by virtue of the provisions of this act may with like force and effect be executed by such employes of the Commonwealth as the secretary may from time to time designate for said purpose.(b) This act and its provisions are of Statewide concern and 1234567891011121314151617181920 occupy the whole field of regulation regarding the registration, sale, transportation, distribution, notification of use, and use of pesticides to the exclusion of all local regulations. Except as otherwise specifically provided in this act, no ordinance or regulation of any political subdivision or home rule municipality may prohibit or in any way attempt to regulate any matter relating to the registration, sale, transportation, handling or use of pesticides, if any of these ordinances, laws or regulations are in conflict with this act.(c) Notwithstanding subsection (b), a municipal corporation may, by ordinance, establish a restricted application district in a contiguous geographic area where the population density is not less than three hundred persons per square mile. The ordinance under this subsection may limit or prohibit the application of specified pesticides in outdoor areas by a commercial applicator, or a pesticide application technician on behalf of a commercial applicator, on privately held property. The scope of authority under this subsection shall not include the regulation of aerial application, applications on public property, applications on agricultural property or applications by public applicators.(d) The Department of Community and Economic Development shall, within one hundred twenty days of the effective date of this subsection, prepare a sample advisory ordinance that may be used by a municipal corporation to exercise the authority delegated under subsection (c).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2389PN3209 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627